Hawaii statutes.
B. Residential Leases

Cross References

Infrastructure development fund (Kikala-Keokea), see
§171-19.5.

§171-70 Findings and declaration of
necessity. It is hereby found and declared that:

(1) There is a shortage within the State of lands
suitable for residential use, available to persons whose incomes and
circumstances are such that they do not qualify for or do not require publicly
provided low-rent housing accommodations and who are able to secure financing
for the construction of their own homes, but who are unable through lack of
sufficient financial ability to purchase land in fee simple or to pay the
premiums for the rentals under leases offered by private landowners;

(2) This group includes persons whose residential
property has been taken for public purposes and who, while they have received
the full and fair value of their property, by purchase or condemnation, are
unable to replace the property taken with the proceeds paid or other available
funds because of the shortage of similar property in the community;

(3) This group also includes those persons who are in
low-rent housing accommodations and are discouraged from increasing their
annual income for fear that they may forfeit their low-rent public housing;

(4) Experience has demonstrated that when public
lands are subdivided and sold in fee simple at public auction, for residential
use, the demands for residential property have forced the price of such lands
beyond the financial reach of the persons previously mentioned, and that neither
the program of opening public lands for sale in fee simple as residence lots,
nor the programs for providing low-rent public housing, for urban redevelopment
or for urban renewal are adequate or designed to provide the opportunity for
such persons to provide themselves with decent, safe, sanitary, and uncongested
residence accommodations consistent with their financial ability and necessary
to provide the environment conducive to promoting their own and their
children's good citizenship;

(5) To alleviate this shortage of land suitable for
residential use, to promote home ownership on as widespread a basis as
possible, and to promote the accomplishment of the purposes of the programs for
public low-rent housing, urban redevelopment and urban renewal, including the
elimination of slum and other conditions detrimental to the public health,
safety, and welfare, it is necessary that public lands be made available on
terms within the financial means of those residents who, because of the
shortage before mentioned, are unable to purchase public or private lands in
fee simple or to lease private lands for use for residential purposes. Making
public lands available for such purposes, pursuant to this part, is hereby
declared to be a public purpose. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-66; HRS
§171-70]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next